Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0734.
people of the state of michigan enact: An act to provide for the audit and examination of this state and state funds; to provide for the audit and examination of the books and accounts of all branches, departments, offices, boards, commissions, agencies, authorities, and institutions of this state; to prescribe powers and duties of certain state officers and employees; to provide for access to records; to provide for the subpoena of witnesses and production of documents and records; to prescribe penalties; to prescribe the membership and procedures of the joint oversight committee and provide for its powers and duties; and to provide for the administration of this act. Sec. 2. (1) As provided in section 55 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963, the joint oversight committee consists of the following 8 members, not more than 4 of whom may be members of the same political party: (a) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. (b) Two members of the house of representatives, appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives. (c) Two members of the senate, appointed by the majority leader of the senate. (d) Two members of the senate, appointed by the minority leader of the senate. (2) The first members of the committee must be appointed not later than 60 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (3) The term of a member of the committee is for the remainder of the legislative session during which the member is appointed to the committee, or until a successor is appointed, whichever is later. (4) As provided in section 55 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963, a vacancy on the committee must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment, and a member appointed to fill a vacancy shall fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (5) A member of the committee may be removed by either of the following: (a) The individual who appointed that member of the committee, for good cause or necessity. (b) The house of the legislature that the member of the committee serves in, by resolution adopted by a majority vote. (6) The speaker of the house of representatives shall designate 1 of the members appointed under subsection (1)(a) to call the first meeting of the committee. At the first meeting of the committee, the committee shall do all of the following: (a) Elect 2 or 4 co-chairpersons, not more than half of whom may be members of the same political party or house of the legislature. (b) Elect a first chairperson from among the co-chairpersons. The co-chairpersons shall alternate as chairperson every 3 months. (c) Elect other officers that the committee considers necessary or appropriate. (7) The committee shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or at the request of a majority of the members of the committee. (8) A majority of the members of the committee constitute a quorum for transacting business. A vote of a majority of the members of the committee serving is required for any action of the committee. (9) The committee shall conduct its business according to rules adopted by the legislature. (10) A member of the committee is not entitled to compensation for serving on the committee. (11) The chairperson of the committee or a member designated by the chairperson, on a majority vote of the committee, may administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and examine books and records necessary to complete the review described in subsection (12)(b). (12) The committee shall do all of the following: (a) Receive from the auditor general all post audits and reports completed under section 53 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963. (b) Review the post audits and reports described in subdivision (a). (13) The committee may make recommendations to the legislature based on the review described in subsection (12)(b). A recommendation made under this subsection must be submitted to the speaker of the house of representatives and the senate majority leader in a writing adopted by a majority of the members of the committee. (14) The committee may hire staff to assist the committee under this section. The supervision of staff, budgeting, procurement, and related functions of the committee must be performed by the council administrator under section 104a of the legislative council act, 1986 PA 268, MCL 4.1104a. (15) As used in this section, "committee" means the joint oversight committee described in subsection (1). Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Joint Resolution G of the 103rd Legislature becomes a part of the state constitution of 1963 as provided in section 1 of article XII of the state constitution of 1963.